Illinois, session 104th, HB2313.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State of Illinois Recreational Use of 5Leased Land Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (745 ILCS 67/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title; purpose. This Act may be cited as the 8the State of Illinois Recreational Use of Leased Land Act.9    The purpose of this Act is to encourage owners of land 10through nominal leases to the State of Illinois Department of 11Natural Resources to make land and water areas available to 12members of the general public for recreational uses by 13limiting their liability toward persons entering thereon for 14such uses.15(Source: P.A. 95-603, eff. 9-11-07.)